dictsource/rm_rules
// Romansh grapheme-to-phoneme rules

.group a
	a	a
	an (_	@n  // vegnan
	ar (_	''a:  // visitar, zuppar
	as (_	@s  // vegnas
	atg (_	'atC	// patratg, malfatg, surtratg
	au	aU
	aus (_	'aUs  // donnegiaus
	avel (_	'a:v@l  // vegnavel

.group à
	à	''a

.group b
	b	b
	bb	b:

.group c
	c	k

.group d
	d	d
	dd	d:
	dad (_	d'a:d	// svaneivladad, societad
	dads (_	d'a:ds	// svaneivladads, societads

.group e
	e	e
	egl (_	'el^  // smarvegl, vegl
	egla (_	'el^a  // vegla
	eglas (_	'el^as  // veglas
	ei	EI
	ein (_	'EIn
	etg (_	'e:tC	// temeletg, turpetg
	etsch (_	'EtS	// cametsch, manetsch

.group f
	f	f
	ff	f:

.group g
	g	g
	gg	g:
	gh	g
	gi (A	dZ
	gi (a_	dZ'i#  // [i] only if stressed
	gì (a_	dZ'i#
	gl	l^
	gl (A	gl
	gn	n^

.group h
	h

.group i
	i	I
	in (_	'in	// Martin, Flurin, termin, zaclin
	ir (_	'i:	// partir, vegnir
	itg (_	'ItC	// Turitg
	iu (_	'e:U	// past participles
	ius (_	'e:Us	// past participles

.group j
	j	j

.group k
	k	k
	kk	k:

.group l
	l	l

.group m
	m	m
	mm	m:

.group n
	n	n
	n (g	N
	n (k	N

.group o
	o	O

.group p
	p	p
	pp	p:
	ph	f   // foreign words

.group q
	q	k
	qu (A	kw
	qui (A	kwj

.group r
	r	r

.group s
	s	s
	ss	s:
	sch	S
	sm	Sm	// smarvegl
	sp	Sp
	st	St
	sv	Zv	// svaneivladad, svanir, sveglarin, svelt

.group t
	t	t
	tt	t:
	tg	tC

.group u
	u	U
	un (_	'Un
	uns (_	'Uns
	ur (_	'u:r	// rubadur, svapur, zercladur
	urs (_	'u:rs

.group v
	v	v
	vv	v:

.group w
	w	w2

.group x
	x	ks

.group y
	y	j
	y (K	i   // foreign words

.group z
	z	ts

.group
	ñ	n^
	ș	S
	ş	S
